Ohio, session 136, HB415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be 8
amended and section 3319.48 of the Revised Code be enacted to 9
read as follows: 10
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 11
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 12
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 13
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 14
contract filed with the director under this section. 15
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 16

H. B. No. 415 Page 2
As Introduced
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 17
following: 18
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 19
following: 20
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 21
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 22
2003; 23
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 24
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 25
(2) The education program of the school, including the 26
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 27
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 28
focus of the curriculum; 29
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 30
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 31
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 32
assessments; 33
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 34
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 35
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 36
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 37
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 38
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 39
Code; 40
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 41
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 42
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 43
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 44

H. B. No. 415 Page 3
As Introduced
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 45
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 46
student. 47
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 48
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 49
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 50
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 51
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 52
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 53
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 54
117.10 of the Revised Code. 55
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 56
to be used that contains at least the following information: 57
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 58
instructional purposes; 59
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 60
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 61
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 62
that are paid by the school; 63
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 64
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 65
operator, if any. 66
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 67
following: 68
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 69
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 70
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 71
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 72

H. B. No. 415 Page 4
As Introduced
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 73
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 74
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 75
any position. 76
(11) That the school will comply with the following 77
requirements: 78
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 79
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 80
twenty hours per school year. 81
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 82
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 83
the school. 84
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 85
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 86
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 87
religious institution. 88
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 89
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 90
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 91
3313.472, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 92
3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 93
3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.643, 94
3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 95
3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 96
3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 97
3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 98
3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 99
3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 100
3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 101

H. B. No. 415 Page 5
As Introduced
3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.48, 3319.614, 102
3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 103
3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 104
3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 105
5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 106
4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a 107
school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the 108
Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the 109
Revised Code. 110
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 111
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 112
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 113
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 114
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 115
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 116
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 117
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 118
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 119
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 120
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 121
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 122
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 123
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 124
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 125
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 126
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 127
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 128
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 129
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 130
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 131
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 132

H. B. No. 415 Page 6
As Introduced
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 133
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 134
subject area competency adopted by the department under 135
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 136
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 137
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 138
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 139
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 140
cooperative education developed by the department under division 141
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 142
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 143
months after the end of each school year a report of its 144
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 145
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 146
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 147
in the school. 148
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 149
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 150
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 151
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 152
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 153
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 154
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 155
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 156
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 157
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 158
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 159
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 160
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 161
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 162

H. B. No. 415 Page 7
As Introduced
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 163
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 164
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 165
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 166
unless it is either of the following: 167
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 168
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 169
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 170
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 171
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 172
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 173
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 174
Revised Code. 175
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 176
to employees; 177
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 178
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 179
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 180
(E) of this section. 181
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 182
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 183
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 184
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 185
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 186
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 187
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 188
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 189
Revised Code; 190

H. B. No. 415 Page 8
As Introduced
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 191
or part of an existing public school or educational service 192
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 193
a converted public school or service center building, 194
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 195
that the board of education or service center governing board 196
that operated the school or building before conversion is 197
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 198
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 199
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 200
agreement applicable to such employees; 201
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 202
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 203
governing authority of the community school; 204
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 205
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 206
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 207
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 208
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 209
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 210
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 211
the district in which the school is located; 212
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 213
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 214
located; 215
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 216
other district in the state. 217
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 218
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 219

H. B. No. 415 Page 9
As Introduced
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 220
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 221
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 222
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 223
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 224
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 225
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 226
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 227
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 228
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 229
(b) The authority of the department as the community 230
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 231
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 232
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 233
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 234
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 235
action. 236
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 237
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 238
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 239
with criteria for student participation established by the 240
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 241
Revised Code; 242
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 243
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 244
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 245
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 246
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 247
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 248

H. B. No. 415 Page 10
As Introduced
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 249
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 250
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 251
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 252
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 253
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 254
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 255
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 256
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 257
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 258
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 259
policies will be available for public inspection; 260
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 261
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 262
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 263
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 264
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 265
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 266
the Revised Code; 267
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 268
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 269
of the following information: 270
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 271
will be used; 272
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 273
be determined and documented; 274
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 275
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 276

H. B. No. 415 Page 11
As Introduced
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 277
the school will document participation in learning 278
opportunities; 279
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 280
monitored; 281
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 282
be protected; 283
(g) A description of the professional development 284
activities that will be offered to teachers. 285
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 286
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 287
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 288
interest at a fair market rate; 289
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 290
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 291
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 292
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 293
contracted. 294
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 295
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 296
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 297
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 298
the parent's or student's primary residence. 299
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 300
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 301
students enrolling in or attending the school. 302
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 303
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 304

H. B. No. 415 Page 12
As Introduced
following: 305
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 306
school will be selected in the future; 307
(2) The management and administration of the school; 308
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 309
school or educational service center building, alternative 310
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 311
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 312
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 313
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 314
of the school; 315
(5) Internal financial controls. 316
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 317
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 318
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 319
authority of the school. 320
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 321
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 322
community school may provide for the community school governing 323
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 324
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 325
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 326
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 327
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 328
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 329
receives from the state. 330
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 331
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 332

H. B. No. 415 Page 13
As Introduced
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 333
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 334
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 335
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 336
contract; 337
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 338
performance and the organization and operation of the community 339
school on at least an annual basis; 340
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 341
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 342
contract; 343
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 344
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 345
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 346
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 347
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 348
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 349
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 350
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 351
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 352
closes prior to the end of a school year. 353
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 354
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 355
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 356
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 357
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 358
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 359
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 360
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 361

H. B. No. 415 Page 14
As Introduced
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 362
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 363
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 364
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 365
within one year after the contract entered into under this 366
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 367
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 368
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 369
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 370
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 371
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 372
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 373
Sec. 3319.48. (A) As used in this section : 374
(1) "Public primary or secondary school" includes both of 375
the following: 376
(a) A preschool as defined in section 2950.034 of the 377
Revised Code, but excludes private institutions or centers; 378
(b) A school operated by a city, local, or exempted 379
village school district, a joint vocational school district, a 380
community school established under Chapter 3314., a STEM school 381
established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory 382
boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised 383
Code. 384
(2) "Race" includes traits associated with an individual's 385
race, including hair texture and protective hair styles, such as 386
braids, locks, and twists. 387
(B) No public primary or secondary school shall 388
discriminate against any student with respect to any program or 389
activity on account of the student's traits that are associated 390

H. B. No. 415 Page 15
As Introduced
with the student's race. 391
(C) Any student alleging that a public primary or 392
secondary school has violated this section may bring a civil 393
action in any court of competent jurisdiction. 394
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 395
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 396
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 397
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 398
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 399
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.48, 400
3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 401
3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 402
3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 403
3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 404
3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 405
3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 406
3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 407
3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 408
3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 409
3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 410
3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 411
3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 412
3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 413
3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.48, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 414
3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 415
3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 416
3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and 417
Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 418
4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were 419
a school district. 420

H. B. No. 415 Page 16
As Introduced
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 421
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 422
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 423
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 424
3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 425
3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 426
3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 427
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 428
3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 429
3319.46, 3319.48, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 430
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 431
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 432
were a district board of education. 433
Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 434
3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 435
Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle 436
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 437
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 438
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 439
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 440
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 441
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 442
as presented in this act: 443
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 444
214, H.B. 250, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 445
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 47, 446
H.B. 214, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 447
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 448
H.B. 47 and H.B. 214 of the 135th General Assembly. 449

H. B. No. 415 Page 17
As Introduced
Section 4. This act shall be known as the Creating a 450
Respectful and Open World for Natural Hair (CROWN) Act. 451